District of Columbia statutes.
26-431.07

Examinations in cooperation with other regulators.

(a)

The Commissioner may enter into cooperative agreements with financial institutions regulators in jurisdictions other than the District, including federal regulators, for the coordination of, or joint participation, in a community performance evaluation and the amount and assessment of fees for the examination or actions related to the examination.

(b)

The Commissioner may accept evaluations performed under the agreements described in subsection (a) of this section.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 407, 48 DCR 3244

History